Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.155

Transcribing mutilated records—Prior transcribing validated.

All records transcribed by order of any board of county commissioners in this state prior to the effective date of chapter 14, Laws of 1893, shall be and are hereby declared the legal records of said county the same as if transcribed under the provisions of RCW 36.32.150 through 36.32.170.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.32.155. Prior: 1893 c 14 s 4; RRS s 4068.]